Utah statutes.
53-2a-1003.   "Energy resources" defined.

As used in this part, "energy resources" includes electricity, natural gas, gasoline and middle distillates, coal, wood fuels, geothermal sources, radioactive materials, and any other resource yielding energy.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

